Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-324.01
Fund; distribution; projects; requirements; applicability.

Beginning on January 1, 2022, the commission shall ensure that funds distributed from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund for construction of new broadband infrastructure shall go to projects that provide broadband service scalable to one hundred megabits per second or greater for downloading and one hundred megabits per second or greater for uploading. This section shall not apply to any disbursements from any Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund wireless infrastructure grant program, the purpose of which is to improve wireless telecommunications service coverage through grants for the construction of wireless telecommunications service facilities.

Laws 2021, LB338, § 4.